Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
INCORPORATION

[§414-31] Incorporators. One or more
individuals may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by
delivering articles of incorporation to the department director for filing. [L
2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next